New Jersey, session 222, A3191.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.54A:5-2 is amended to read as follows: 54A:5-2.     Losses.  a. Losses which occur within one category of gross income may be applied against other sources of gross income within [the same] another category of gross income during the taxable year [.  However,] and a net loss in one category of gross income may [not] be applied against gross income in another category of gross income. b.    A taxpayer who sustains a net loss in a category of gross income set forth in N.J.S.54A:5-1, after applying that net loss against the other categories of gross income, may carry that loss forward, if necessary and in accordance with the terms and conditions prescribed by the director, for application as a deduction from gross income for each of the 20 taxable years following the taxable year in which the net loss occurs. (cf: N.J.S.54A:5-2) 2.    P.L.2011, c.60 (C.54A:3-9) is repealed. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018.